West Virginia, session 2026, SB237.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. PREVENTION AND CONTROL OF COMMUNICABLE AND OTHER INFECTIOUS DISEASES. §16-3-4d.  Prohibiting mandates for vaccinations. Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, vaccinations for any purpose may not be mandated by any entity defined in §16-1-2 of this code or by any state or local governmental official, entity, department, or agency.